Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1931
Appeal; procedure.

Any person aggrieved by final action of the secretary under the Licensing of Truth and Deception Examiners Act may appeal the final action, and such appeal shall be in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act.

Laws 1980, LB 485, § 31;

Laws 1988, LB 352, § 181.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.